Utah statutes.
4-25-2.   County responsibility for estrays -- Contracts with other local
governments authorized.
Each county is responsible for the disposition of all estrays found within its
boundaries. Each county in the discharge of its responsibility, however, may
contract upon mutually agreeable terms with any city, town, or other county
with an animal control office to perform any or all of the functions imposed
by this chapter.
